Nebraska, session 109, LB296A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $-0- from the State Department
of Education Improvement Grant Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $-0- from the State
Department of Education Improvement Grant Fund for FY2026-27 to the State
Department of Education, for Program 161, to aid in carrying out the provisions
of Legislative Bill 296, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, First Session, 2025.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems from
funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $160,197 for FY2025-26 or
$165,403 for FY2026-27.
-1-